California, session 20252026, AB520.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6 (commencing with Section 12490) is added to Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 6. Homelessness and Mental Health Funding Information 12490. By January 1, 2027, the Controller, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services and the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, shall develop, publish, and maintain an online search portal that contains the information described in subdivisions (a) and (b). The Controller, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the California Interagency Council on Homelessness shall each provide a link to this online portal readily available on their internet websites. The following information shall be made available:(a) (1) The total amount of funding distributed, per fiscal year, by the Controller’s office for programs and services associated with homelessness and the prevention of homelessness.(A) The Controller shall list the total funding amounts distributed for homelessness for the previous 10 fiscal years in conjunction with the current fiscal year.(B) The Controller shall make apparent the differences in funding levels between fiscal years.(2) A searchable and itemized listing of all programs and services that received funding by the Controller for addressing and preventing homelessness in the current fiscal year. Each listing shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(A) The name of the state program that received the funds and the department or agency that administers the program.(B) The objective or mission of the program.(C) The amount distributed to the program by the Controller in the fiscal year.(D) The amount appropriated by the program in the fiscal year.(E) A contact email address and telephone number for the program’s liaison.(F) The date the program becomes active or inactive, if applicable.(b) (1) The total amount of funding distributed, per fiscal year, by the Controller’s Office for programs and services associated with mental health.(A) The Controller shall list the total funding amounts distributed for mental health for the previous 10 fiscal years in conjunction with the current fiscal year.(B) The Controller shall make apparent the differences in funding levels between fiscal years.(2) A searchable and itemized listing of all programs and services that received funding by the Controller for addressing mental health in the current fiscal year. Each listing shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:(A) The name of the state program that received the funds and the department or agency that administers the program.(B) The objective or mission of the program.(C) The amount distributed to the program by the Controller in the fiscal year.(D) The amount appropriated by the program in the fiscal year.(E) A contact email address and telephone number for the program’s liaison.(F) The date the program becomes active or inactive, if applicable.12492. The Controller, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the California Interagency Council on Homelessness may request any relevant information from a state agency or department for the purpose of reporting accurate information within the portal.